Hawaii statutes.
[§346-17.2] Health assessment.
The department shall ensure the provision of a comprehensive health assessment
for each child in out-of-home placement forty-five days before or after an
initial placement. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next